California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) If the board contracts with any other entity to carry out this section, the executive officer of the board, or his or her designee, shall review the activities and performance of the contractor on a biennial basis. As part of this review, the board shall review files of participants in the program. However, the names of participants who entered the program voluntarily shall remain
 confidential, except when the review reveals misdiagnosis, case mismanagement, or noncompliance by the participant.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall apply to all new participants entering into the board’s rehabilitation program on or after January 1, 2007. Subdivision (a) shall apply on and after January 1, 2008, to participants currently enrolled as of December 31, 2007.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 68.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2669.

Participation in a rehabilitation program shall not be a defense to any disciplinary action that may be taken by the board. This section does not preclude the board from commencing disciplinary action against a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant who is terminated unsuccessfully from the program. That disciplinary action may not include as evidence any confidential information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 69.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Offenses Against this Chapter [2670. - 2672.]

2670.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 9.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

2672.

Whenever any person has engaged or is about to engage in any acts or practices that constitute or will constitute an offense against this chapter, the superior court of any county, on application of the board, or 10 or more persons holding physical therapist licenses issued under this chapter, may issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining the conduct. Proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 71.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Fiscal Administration [2680. - 2689.]

2680.

The board shall keep a record of its proceedings under this chapter, and a register of all persons licensed under it. The register shall show the name of every living licensee, his or her last known place of residence, and the date and number of his or her license as a physical therapist. The board shall compile a list of physical therapists authorized to practice physical therapy in the state. Any interested person is entitled to obtain a copy of that list upon application to the board and payment of such amount as may be fixed by the board which amount shall not exceed the cost of the list so furnished.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 829, Sec. 61.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2681.

Within 10 days after the beginning of each calendar month the board shall report to the State Controller the amount and source of all collections made from persons licensed or seeking to be licensed under this chapter and at the same time pay all such sums into the State Treasury, where they shall be credited to the Physical Therapy Fund.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2693 by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

2682.

There is in the State Treasury the Physical Therapy Fund. All collections from persons licensed or seeking to be licensed shall be paid by the board into the Physical Therapy Fund after reporting to the Controller at the beginning of each month the amount and source of the collections. All money in the Physical Therapy Fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the exclusive purpose of executing this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 454, Sec. 22.   (AB 1706)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2687.

All fees earned by the board and all fines and forfeitures of bail to which the board is entitled shall be reported at the beginning of each month, for the month preceding, to the State Controller. At the same time, the entire amount of these collections shall be paid into the State Treasury and shall be credited to the Physical Therapy Fund.

This fund shall be for the use of the board to pay all salaries and all other expenses necessarily incurred in carrying into effect the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 74, Sec. 7.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2688.

The amount of fees assessed in connection with licenses issued under this chapter is as follows:

(a) (1) The fee for an application for licensure as a physical therapist submitted to the board prior to March 1, 2009, shall be seventy-five dollars ($75). The fee for an application submitted under Section 2653 to the board prior to March 1, 2009, shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125).

(2) The fee for an application for licensure as a physical therapist submitted to the board on or after March 1, 2009, shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125). The fee for an application submitted under Section 2653 to the board on or after March 1, 2009, shall be
 two hundred dollars ($200).

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), the board may decrease or increase the amount of an application fee under this subdivision, but in no event shall the application fee amount exceed three hundred dollars ($300).

(b) The examination and reexamination fees for the physical therapist examination, physical therapist assistant examination, and the examination to demonstrate knowledge of the California rules and regulations related to the practice of physical therapy shall be the actual cost to the board of the development and writing of, or purchase of the examination, and grading of each written examination, plus the actual cost of administering each examination. The board, at its discretion, may require the licensure applicant to pay the fee for the examinations required by Section 2636 directly to the organization conducting the examination.

(c) (1) The fee for a physical therapist license issued prior to March 1, 2009, shall be seventy-five dollars ($75).

(2) The fee for a physical therapist license issued on or after March 1, 2009, shall be one hundred dollars ($100).

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), the board may decrease or increase the amount of the fee under this subdivision, but in no event shall the fee to issue the license exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(d) (1) The fee to renew a physical therapist license that expires prior to April 1, 2009, shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(2) The fee to renew a physical therapist license that expires on or
 after April 1, 2009, shall be two hundred dollars ($200).

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), the board may decrease or increase the amount of the renewal fee under this subdivision, but in no event shall the renewal fee amount exceed three hundred dollars ($300).

(e) (1) The fee for application and for issuance of a physical therapist assistant license shall be seventy-five dollars ($75) for an application submitted to the board prior to March 1, 2009.

(2) The fee for application and for issuance of a physical therapist assistant license shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) for an application submitted to the board on or after March 1, 2009. The fee for an application submitted under Section 2653 to the board on or after March 1, 2009, shall be two hundred dollars ($200).

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), the board may decrease or increase the amount of the fee under this subdivision, but in no event shall the application fee amount exceed three hundred dollars ($300).

(f) (1) The fee to renew a physical therapist assistant license that expires prior to April 1, 2009, shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(2) The fee to renew a physical therapist assistant license that expires on or after April 1, 2009, shall be two hundred dollars ($200).

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), the board may decrease or increase the amount of the renewal fee under this subdivision, but in no event shall the renewal fee amount exceed three hundred dollars ($300).

(g) Notwithstanding Section 163.5, the delinquency fee shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect.

(h) (1) The duplicate wall certificate fee shall be fifty dollars ($50). The duplicate renewal receipt fee amount shall be fifty dollars ($50).

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the board may decrease or increase the amount of the fee under this subdivision to an amount that does not exceed the cost of issuing duplicates, but in no event shall that fee exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

(i) (1) The endorsement or letter of good standing fee shall be sixty dollars ($60).

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the board may decrease or increase the
 amount of the fee under this subdivision to an amount that does not exceed the cost of issuing an endorsement or letter, but in no event shall the fee amount exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 454, Sec. 23.   (AB 1706)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2689.

(a) The board may establish by regulation suitable application and renewal fees of not more than two hundred dollars ($200), for persons certified to perform electromyographical testing pursuant to Section 2620.5, based upon the cost of operating the certification program. The application fee shall be paid by the applicant at the time the application is filed and the renewal fee shall be paid as provided in Section 2644.

(b) The board shall charge an examination and reexamination fee of five hundred dollars ($500) to applicants who are examined and who have been found to otherwise meet the board’s standards for certification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 454, Sec. 25.   (AB 1706)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Physical Therapy Corporations [2690. - 2696.]

2690.

A physical therapy corporation is a corporation that is authorized to render professional services, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, so long as that corporation and its shareholders, officers, directors, and employees rendering professional services who are physical therapists are in compliance with the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, this article and all other statutes and regulations now or hereafter enacted or adopted pertaining to the corporation and the conduct of its affairs.

With respect to a physical therapy corporation, the governmental agency referred to in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act is the Physical Therapy Board of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 829, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2691.

It shall constitute unprofessional conduct and a violation of this chapter for any person licensed under this chapter to violate, attempt to violate, directly or indirectly, or assist in or abet the violation of, or conspire to violate any provision or term of this article, the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, or any regulations duly adopted under those laws.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2692.

A physical therapy corporation shall not do or fail to do any act the doing of which or the failure to do which would constitute unprofessional conduct under any statute or regulation, now or hereafter in effect. In the conduct of its practice, it shall observe and be bound by such statutes and regulations to the same extent as a person holding a license under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2693.

The name of a physical therapy corporation and any name or names under which it may render professional services shall contain the words “physical therapy” or “physical therapist”, and wording or abbreviations denoting corporate existence.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2694.

Except as provided in Section 13403 of the Corporations Code, each shareholder, director and officer of a physical therapy corporation, except an assistant secretary and an assistant treasurer, shall be a licensed person as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2695.

The income of a physical therapy corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of such shareholder or his or her shares in the physical therapy corporation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2696.

The board may adopt and enforce regulations to carry out the purposes and objectives of this article, including regulations requiring (a) that the bylaws of a physical therapy corporation shall include a provision whereby the capital stock of the corporation owned by a disqualified person (as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code), or a deceased person, shall be sold to the corporation or to the remaining shareholders of the corporation within the time as the regulations may provide, and (b) that a physical therapy corporation shall provide adequate security by insurance or otherwise for claims against it by its patients arising out of the rendering of professional services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 829, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Nursing [2700. - 2838.4.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [2700. - 2717.]

2700.

This chapter of the Business and Professions Code constitutes the chapter on professional nursing and shall be construed as revisory and amendatory of the laws heretofore enacted. It may be cited as the Nursing Practice Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.

(a) There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs the Board of Registered Nursing consisting of nine members.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “board” means the Board of Registered Nursing. Any reference in state law to the Board of Nurse Examiners of the State of California or the California Board of Nursing Education and Nurse Registration shall be construed to refer to the Board of Registered Nursing.

(c) The board shall have all authority vested in the previous board under this chapter. The board may enforce all disciplinary actions undertaken by the previous board.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027,
 and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2027, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 413, Sec. 4.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of Section 2701 renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 628, Sec. 2.   (AB 1532)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2702.

(a) Each member of the board shall be a resident of the state.

(b) Four members shall represent the public at large, and shall not be licensed under any board under this division or any board referred to in Section 1000 or 3600 and shall have no pecuniary interests in the provision of health care services.

(c) Two members shall be licensed registered nurses under the provisions of this chapter, each of whom shall be active in the practice of their
 profession engaged primarily in direct patient care with at least five continuous years of experience, and who shall not be engaged as an educator or administrator of a nursing education program under the provisions of this chapter.

(d) One member shall be a licensed registered nurse who shall be active as an advanced practice registered nurse as defined in Section 2725.5.

(e) One member shall be a licensed registered nurse under the provisions of this chapter who shall be active as an educator or administrator in an approved program to train registered nurses.

(f) One member shall be a licensed registered nurse who is an administrator of a nursing service with at least five continuous years of
 experience.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 628, Sec. 3.   (AB 1532)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2703.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), all appointments shall be for a term of four years and vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term. No person shall serve more than two consecutive terms.

(b) The Governor shall appoint two of the public
 members and the licensed members of the board qualified as provided in Section 2702. The Senate
 Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member.

(c) The initial appointments shall be for the following terms:

(1) One public member appointed by the Governor shall serve a term of one year. The other public member appointed by the Governor shall serve a term of five years.

(2) One licensed member described in subdivision (c) of Section 2702 shall serve a term of two years. The other licensed member described in subdivision (c) of Section 2702 shall serve a term of three years. The licensed member described in subdivision (e) of Section 2702 shall serve a term of four
 years. Of the two remaining licensed members, one shall serve a term of two years, and the other shall serve a term of three years.

(3) Each public member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules or the Speaker of the Assembly shall serve a term of four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 98)   Effective February 14, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2706.

Pursuant to Section 106, each appointing authority has the power to remove from office, at any time, any member of the board appointed by that authority under Section 2703 for continued neglect of duties required by law, or for incompetence, or unprofessional or dishonorable conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 413, Sec. 5.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2707.

The board shall annually elect from its members a president, vice president, and any other officers as it may deem necessary. The officers of the board shall hold their respective positions during its pleasure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1275, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2708.

(a) The board shall appoint an executive officer who shall perform the duties delegated by the board and be responsible to the board for the accomplishment of those duties.

(b) The executive officer shall be a nurse currently licensed under this chapter and shall possess other qualifications as determined by the board.

(c) The executive officer shall not be a member of the board.

(d) The executive officer is authorized to adopt a decision entered by default and a stipulation for surrender of a license.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January
 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2027, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 413, Sec. 6.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2708.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Board of Registered Nursing in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 107, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2709.

The board for the purpose of transacting its business shall meet at least once every three months, at times and places it designates by resolution. Meetings shall be held in northern and southern California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 789, Sec. 2.   (SB 122)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2709.5.

The board shall accept in payment of any fee required by this chapter cash or any customary or generally accepted medium of exchange, including check, cashier’s check, certified check or money order. For the purposes of this section, customary or generally accepted medium of exchange does not include postage stamps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 810, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2710.

(a) Special meetings may be held at such times as the board may elect, or on the call of the president of the board, or of not less than three members thereof.

(b) A written notice of the time, place, and object of any special meeting shall be sent electronically by the executive officer to all members of the board who are not parties to the call, at least 15 days before the day of the meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 24.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2710.5.

The board, with permission of the Director of the Department of Consumer Affairs, may form advisory committees to advise the board on the implementation of this chapter. Members of such advisory committees shall be entitled to a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

2712.

Five members of the board constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1055, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2713.

The board shall keep a record of all its proceedings, including a register of all applicants for licenses under this chapter and the action of the board upon each application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 742, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2714.

The office of the board shall be in the city of Sacramento. Suboffices may be established in Los Angeles and San Francisco and such records as may be necessary may be transferred temporarily to them. Legal proceedings against the board may be instituted in any county in which any of the three cities above mentioned is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

2715.

(a) The board shall prosecute all persons guilty of violating this chapter.

(b) Except as provided by Section 159.5, the board, in accordance with the Civil Service Law, may employ personnel, including legal counsel, as it deems necessary to carry into effect this chapter.

(c) The board shall have and use a seal bearing the name “Board of Registered Nursing.” The board may adopt, amend, or repeal, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the rules and regulations that may be reasonably necessary to enable it to
 carry into effect this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 7.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2716.

Each member of the board shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1645.)
-------------------------------------------

2717.

(a) The board shall incorporate regional forecasts into its biennial analyses of the nursing workforce conducted pursuant to Section 502.

(b) The board shall develop a plan to address regional areas of shortage identified by its nursing workforce forecast.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 413, Sec. 7.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Scope of Regulation [2725. - 2742.]

2725.

(a) In amending this section at the 1973–74 session, the Legislature recognizes that nursing is a dynamic field, the practice of which is continually evolving to include more sophisticated patient care activities. It is the intent of the Legislature in amending this section at the 1973–74 session to provide clear legal authority for functions and procedures that have common acceptance and usage. It is the legislative intent also to recognize the existence of overlapping functions between physicians and registered nurses and to permit additional
 sharing of functions within organized health care systems that provide for collaboration between physicians and registered nurses. These organized health care systems include, but are not limited to, health facilities licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, clinics, home health agencies, physicians’ offices, and public or community health services.

(b) The practice of nursing within the meaning of this chapter means those functions, including basic health care, that help people cope with difficulties in daily living that are associated with their actual or potential health or illness problems or the treatment thereof, and that require a substantial amount of scientific knowledge or technical skill, including all of the following:

(1) Direct and indirect patient care services that ensure the safety, comfort,
 personal hygiene, and protection of patients; and the performance of disease prevention and restorative measures.

(2) Direct and indirect patient care services, including, but not limited to, the administration of medications and therapeutic agents, necessary to implement a treatment, disease prevention, or rehabilitative regimen ordered by and within the scope of licensure of a physician, dentist, podiatrist, or clinical psychologist, as defined by Section 1316.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) The performance of skin tests, immunization techniques, and the withdrawal of human blood from veins and arteries.

(4) Observation of signs and symptoms of illness, reactions to treatment, general behavior, or general physical condition, and (A) determination of whether the signs, symptoms, reactions, behavior, or general
 appearance exhibit abnormal characteristics, and (B) implementation, based on observed abnormalities, of appropriate reporting, or referral, or standardized procedures, or changes in treatment regimen in accordance with standardized procedures, or the initiation of emergency procedures.

(c) “Standardized procedures,” as used in this section, means either of the following:

(1) Policies and protocols developed by a health facility licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code through collaboration among administrators and health professionals including physicians and nurses.

(2) Policies and protocols developed through collaboration among administrators and health professionals, including physicians and nurses, by an organized health care system which is not a
 health facility licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

The policies and protocols shall be subject to any guidelines for standardized procedures that the Division of Licensing of the Medical Board of California and the Board of Registered Nursing may jointly promulgate. If promulgated, the guidelines shall be administered by the Board of Registered Nursing.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require approval of standardized procedures by the Division of Licensing of the Medical Board of California, or by the Board of Registered Nursing.

(e) No state agency other than the board may define or interpret the practice of nursing for those licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, or develop standardized procedures or protocols pursuant to this
 chapter, unless so authorized by this chapter, or specifically required under state or federal statute. “State agency” includes every state office, officer, department, division, bureau, board, authority, and commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 640, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2725.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a registered nurse may dispense drugs or devices upon an order by a licensed physician and surgeon or an order by a certified nurse-midwife, nurse practitioner, or physician assistant issued pursuant to Section 2746.51, 2836.1, or 3502.1, respectively, if the registered nurse is functioning within a licensed primary care clinic as defined in subdivision (a) of
 Section 1204 of, or within a clinic as defined in subdivision (b), (c), (h), or (j) of Section 1206 of, the Health and Safety Code.

(b) No clinic shall employ a registered nurse to perform dispensing duties exclusively. No registered nurse shall dispense drugs in a pharmacy, keep a pharmacy, open shop, or drugstore for the retailing of drugs or poisons. No registered nurse shall compound drugs. Dispensing of drugs by a registered nurse, except a certified nurse-midwife who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 2746.51 or a nurse practitioner who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure described in Section 2836.1, or protocol, shall not include substances included in the California Uniform Controlled Substances Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code). Nothing in this section shall exempt a clinic from the provisions of Article 13 (commencing with Section
 4180) of Chapter 9.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit any other authority granted to a certified nurse-midwife pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 2746), to a nurse practitioner pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 2834), or to a physician assistant pursuant to Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500).

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the sites or types of health care facilities at which drugs or devices are authorized to be dispensed pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 4000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 2348)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2725.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a registered nurse may dispense self-administered hormonal contraceptives approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA) and may administer injections of hormonal contraceptives approved by the FDA in strict adherence to standardized procedures developed in compliance with subdivision (c) of Section 2725.

(b) The standardized procedure described
 in subdivision (a) shall include all of the following:

(1) Which nurse, based on successful completion of training and competency assessment, may dispense or administer the hormonal contraceptives.

(2) Minimum training requirements regarding educating patients on medical standards for ongoing women’s preventive health, contraception options education and counseling, properly eliciting, documenting, and assessing patient and family health history, and utilization of the United States Medical Eligibility Criteria for Contraceptive Use.

(3) Demonstration of competency in providing the appropriate prior examination comprised of checking blood pressure, weight, and patient and family health history, including medications taken by the patient.

(4) Which
 hormonal contraceptives may be dispensed or administered under specified circumstances, utilizing the most recent version of the United States Medical Eligibility Criteria for Contraceptive Use.

(5) Criteria and procedure for identification, documentation, and referral of patients with contraindications for hormonal contraceptives and patients in need of a followup visit to a physician and surgeon, nurse practitioner, certified nurse-midwife, or physician assistant.

(6) The extent of physician and surgeon supervision required.

(7) The method of periodic review of the nurse’s competence.

(8) The method of periodic review of the standardized procedure, including, but not limited to, the required frequency of review and the person conducting that
 review.

(9) Adherence to subdivision (a) of Section 2242 in a manner developed through collaboration with health care providers, including physicians and surgeons, certified nurse-midwives, nurse practitioners, physician assistants, and registered nurses. The appropriate prior examination shall be consistent with the evidence-based practice guidelines adopted by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention in conjunction with the United States Medical Eligibility Criteria for Contraceptive Use.

(10) If a patient has been seen exclusively by a registered nurse for three consecutive years, the patient shall be evaluated by a physician and surgeon, nurse practitioner, certified nurse-midwife, or physician assistant prior to continuing the dispensation or administration of hormonal contraceptives.

(c) Nothing
 in this section shall be construed to affect the sites or types of health care facilities at which drugs or devices are authorized to be dispensed pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 4000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 460, Sec. 2.   (AB 2348)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2725.3.

(a) A health facility licensed pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (f), of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code shall not assign unlicensed personnel to perform nursing functions in lieu of a registered nurse and may not allow unlicensed personnel to perform functions under the direct clinical supervision of a registered nurse that require a substantial amount of scientific knowledge and technical skills, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Administration of medication.

(2) Venipuncture or intravenous therapy.

(3) Parenteral or tube feedings.

(4) Invasive procedures including inserting nasogastric tubes, inserting catheters, or tracheal suctioning.

(5) Assessment of patient condition.

(6) Educating patients and their families concerning the patient’s health care problems, including postdischarge care.

(7) Moderate complexity laboratory tests.

(b) This section shall not preclude any person from performing any act or function that he or she is authorized to perform pursuant to
 Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) or pursuant to existing statute or regulation as of July 1, 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 945, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2725.4.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the following shall apply:

(a) In order to perform an abortion by aspiration techniques pursuant to Section 2253, a person with a license or certificate to practice as a nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to a standardized procedure, or a qualified nurse practitioner functioning pursuant to Section 2837.103 or 2837.104, shall achieve clinical competency by successfully completing requisite training, which shall include both a clinical and didactic component, in performing these procedures provided by any of the following:

(1) A board-approved nurse practitioner program or in a course offered by an accredited nurse practitioner program.

(2) A course offered by a board-approved continuing education provider that reflects evidence-based curriculum and training guidelines or a course approved for Category I continuing medical education.

(3) A course offered by a state or national health care professional or accreditation organization.

(4) Training based on the competency-based training protocols established by the Health Workforce Pilot Project (HWPP) No. 171 through the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development, now known as the Department of Health Care Access and Information.

(5) Training and evaluation of clinical competency, performed at a clinic or hospital, on performing abortion by aspiration techniques that is provided by any of the following who have performed the
 procedure themselves:

(A) A physician and surgeon.

 (B) A nurse practitioner or certified nurse midwife authorized to perform abortion by aspiration techniques pursuant to this section.

(C) A physician assistant authorized to perform abortion by aspiration techniques pursuant to Section 3502.4.

(b) In order to perform an abortion by aspiration techniques pursuant to Section 2253, a person with a license or certificate to practice as a certified nurse-midwife shall achieve clinical competency by successfully completing requisite training, which shall include both a clinical and didactic component, in performing these procedures provided by any of the following:

(1) A board-approved
 nurse-midwifery program or in a course offered by an accredited nurse-midwifery program.

(2) A course offered by a Board-approved continuing education provider that reflects evidence-based curriculum and training guidelines or a course approved for Category I continuing medical education.

(3) A course offered by a state or national health care professional or accreditation organization.

(4) Training based on the competency-based training protocols established by the Health Workforce Pilot Project (HWPP) No. 171 through the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development, now known as the Department of Health Care Access and Information.

(5) Training and evaluation of clinical competency, performed at a clinic or hospital, on performing abortion by
 aspiration techniques that is provided by any of the following who have performed the procedure themselves:

(A) A physician and surgeon.

 (B) A nurse practitioner or certified nurse midwife authorized to perform abortion by aspiration techniques pursuant to this section.

 (C) A physician assistant authorized to perform abortion by aspiration techniques pursuant to Section 3502.4.

(c) A violation of this section by a nurse practitioner or certified nurse midwife constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(d) A nurse practitioner who has completed training required in this section and is functioning pursuant to Section 2837.103 or 2837.104 may perform an abortion by aspiration techniques pursuant
 to Section 2253 without supervision by a physician or surgeon.

(e) A nurse practitioner shall practice abortion by aspiration techniques pursuant to Section 2253 consistent with applicable standards of care and within the scope of their clinical and professional education and training.
